Washington statutes.
RCW 19.86.180

Mailing materials that interfere with census.

Mailing materials with the intent to deceive a person into believing that the material is an official census communication, interfere with the operation of the census, or discourage a person from participating in the census constitutes an unfair or deceptive practice under this chapter.

[ 2020 c 34 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 34: See note following RCW 43.62.060.